Washington statutes.
RCW 16.60.030

Partition fence—Erection—Notice.

When two or more persons own land adjoining which is inclosed [enclosed] by one fence, and it becomes necessary for the protection of the interest of one party said partition fence should be made between them, the other or others, when notified thereof, shall erect or cause to be erected one-half of such partition fence, said fence to be erected on, or as near as practicable, the line of said land.

[Code 1881 s 2492; 1873 p 448 s 5; 1871 p 65 s 5; 1869 p 325 s 5; RRS s 5445.]